Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,125
Professional land surveyor; disciplinary action; hearing; attendance of witnesses; record; findings; order; effect.

The examiner shall have power to compel the attendance of witnesses and to administer oaths and shall take testimony and proof concerning the charges stated in the complaint. A complete record shall be made of all testimony taken and evidence received at such hearing, which record shall be filed with the secretary of the examining board. The examiner conducting such hearing shall make in writing complete findings and recommendations to the examining board. Thereafter, the examining board shall, in writing officially signed by all members concurring therein, make its findings, determination, and order in the matter. If the examining board finds that the professional land surveyor has violated the Land Surveyors Regulation Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, he or she shall be placed on probation or his or her license shall be revoked or suspended. As a condition of probation the examining board may restrict the professional land surveyor's scope of practice or require supervision of the professional land surveyor's practice.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 18, p. 1337;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 43.
September 1, 2024